Nevada, session 83, AB220.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 16, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 6, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Full legal name” means a natural person’s first
name or given name, middle name and family name or last name,
without the use of initials or a nickname. The term includes a full
legal name that has been changed pursuant to the provisions of
section 11 of this act.
Sec. 4. “Identification card” means an identification card
issued by the Department pursuant to sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 5. “Person experiencing homelessness” means a person
who is transient, at imminent risk of homelessness or homeless.
Sec. 6. “Resident” means a person who has actually resided
in this State for at least 6 months.
Sec. 7. 1. To the extent that money is available for that
purpose, the Department, through a division of the Department
designated by the Director, may establish and administer a
program to issue photo identification cards to residents of this
State who are persons experiencing homelessness. If the
Department establishes such a program, the Department shall:
(a) Prepare suitable identification cards.
(b) Prepare and furnish application forms for those cards.
(c) Receive applications, grant or deny the applications and
maintain files of applications.
(d) Issue identification cards, recall and cancel identification
cards when necessary and maintain records adequate to preserve
the integrity of the system for identification cards.
2. A person who applies for an identification card in
accordance with the provisions of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of
this act and who is not ineligible to receive an identification card
pursuant to section 12 of this act is entitled to receive an
identification card if the person:
(a) Is a resident of this State;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(b) Is 10 years of age or older; and
(c) Does not hold a valid driver’s license or identification card
from any state or jurisdiction.
3. The Department shall not charge a fee for the issuance,
renewal or replacement of an identification card.
4. The Department may accept gifts, grants and donations of
money to fund the program to issue identification cards to
residents of this State who are experiencing homelessness. Money
received by the Department pursuant to this subsection does not
revert to the State General Fund at the end of any fiscal year and
must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
5. The personal information contained in any file or record
of the Department relating to an identification card or an
application for an identification card is confidential and is not a
public record for the purposes of chapter 239 of NRS. The
Department may only disclose information made confidential
pursuant to this subsection if such disclosure is necessary for the
Department to carry out its duties or upon the lawful order of a
court of competent jurisdiction.
Sec. 8. 1. The form of identification cards issued by the
Department must be similar to that of identification cards issued
by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to NRS 483.810 to
483.890, inclusive, but distinguishable in color or otherwise.
2. Identification cards issued by the Department do not
authorize the operation of any motor vehicle.
3. If the Department establishes the program described in
section 7 of this act, the Department shall adopt regulations
prescribing the information that must be contained on the
identification card.
Sec. 9. 1. Every application for an identification card must
be made upon a form prescribed by the Department and include,
without limitation, a statement from the applicant attesting that
the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid driver’s license or identification card
from any state or jurisdiction.
(b) Is a person experiencing homelessness.
2. When the form is completed, the applicant must sign the
form and verify the contents before a person authorized to
administer oaths. Officers and employees of the Department may
administer those oaths without charge.
Sec. 10. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
every applicant for an identification card pursuant to sections 2 to
16, inclusive, of this act must furnish proof of his or her full legal
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
name and age by presenting an original or certified copy of the
documents required by the Department of Motor Vehicles
pursuant to NRS 483.860 as proof of the full legal name and age
of an applicant for the issuance of an identification card by the
Department of Motor Vehicles.
2. If an applicant for an identification card does not furnish
the proof of his or her full legal name and age as required by
subsection 1, the Department must not issue to the applicant an
identification card, unless the identification card clearly indicates
on the face of the card that the Department has not verified the
full legal name and age of the card holder pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 11. 1. A person must request that the Department
change his or her full legal name on an identification card after a
legal change of the person’s name indicated on:
(a) An order of a court of competent jurisdiction changing the
name of the person;
(b) A decree of adoption;
(c) A certificate of marriage; or
(d) A decree of divorce.
2. A request required pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be made on a form prescribed by the Department; and
(b) Include an original or certified copy of the order, decree or
certificate.
3. A person may request that the Department change his or
her full legal name on an identification card upon adoption,
marriage, divorce or the death of a spouse. Such a request must be
made on a form prescribed by the Department and must include:
(a) Upon adoption, an original or certified copy of a decree of
adoption and an affidavit on a form prescribed by the Department
indicating the person’s choice to:
(1) Change his or her last name to the last name of one of
his or her adoptive parents;
(2) Use his or her last name hyphenated with the last name
of one of his or her adoptive parents; or
(3) Replace his or her middle name with his or her last
name and use as his or her last name the last name of one of his
or her adoptive parents.
(b) Upon marriage, an original or certified copy of a certificate
of marriage and an affidavit on a form prescribed by the
Department indicating the person’s choice to:
(1) Change his or her last name to the last name of his or
her spouse;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(2) Use his or her last name hyphenated with the last name
of his or her spouse; or
(3) Replace his or her middle name with his or her last
name and use as his or her last name the last name of his or her
spouse.
(c) Upon divorce, an original or certified copy of a decree of
divorce and an affidavit on a form prescribed by the Department
indicating the person’s choice to:
(1) Change his or her last name back to a last name he or
she used before marriage; or
(2) If he or she changed his or her name pursuant to
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b), change his or her middle
name and last name back to the middle name and last name he or
she used before the marriage; or
(d) Upon the death of a spouse, an original or certified copy of
a certificate of marriage and an original or certified copy of a
death certificate and an affidavit on a form prescribed by the
Department indicating the person’s choice to:
(1) Change his or her last name back to a name he or she
used before the marriage; or
(2) If he or she changed his or her name pursuant to
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b), change his or her middle
name and last name back to the middle name and last name he or
she used before marriage.
4. Upon receipt of a request that meets the requirements of
subsection 2 or 3, the Department shall:
(a) Change the full legal name of a person on the
identification card issued to the person by the Department; and
(b) Provide to the person who requested the change a
document which evidences that such a change was made pursuant
to this section.
5. The Department shall not charge or collect a fee for a
change to an identification card pursuant to this section.
Sec. 12. 1. The Department shall not issue an identification
card to an offender or renew the identification card of an offender
until the Department has received information submitted by the
Central Repository pursuant to NRS 179D.570 or other
satisfactory evidence indicating that the offender is in compliance
with the provisions of chapter 179D of NRS.
2. If an offender is not in compliance with the provisions of
chapter 179D of NRS, the Department:
(a) Shall not issue an identification card to the offender or
renew the identification card of the offender; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(b) Shall advise the offender to contact the Central Repository
to determine the actions that the offender must take to be in
compliance with the provisions of chapter 179D of NRS.
3. An identification card issued to an offender expires on the
first anniversary date of the offender’s birthday, measured in the
case of an original identification card, a renewal identification
card and a renewal of an expired identification card, from the
birthday nearest the date of issuance or renewal.
4. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Central Repository” means the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History.
(b) “Offender” includes, without limitation, an “offender
convicted of a crime against a child” as defined in NRS
179D.0559 and a “sex offender” as defined in NRS 179D.095.
Sec. 13. Except as otherwise provided in section 14 of this
act, an identification card that is issued pursuant to sections 2 to
16, inclusive, of this act remains valid until its expiration date so
long as the facts and circumstances declared in the application
and stated on the card do not change and the person does not
become licensed in any state or jurisdiction to drive a motor
vehicle or obtain an identification card from any state or
jurisdiction. An identification card that is issued pursuant to
sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act does not become invalid
because the person ceases to be a person experiencing
homelessness. An identification card issued pursuant to sections 2
to 16, inclusive, of this act must be surrendered upon the issuance
of:
1. A driver’s license from any state or jurisdiction;
2. An identification card from another state or jurisdiction;
or
3. An identification card issued by the Department of Motor
Vehicles pursuant to NRS 483.810 to 483.890, inclusive.
Sec. 14. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections 12 and
13 of this act, an identification card and a renewal of an
identification card issued pursuant to sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of
this act expires as prescribed by the regulations adopted pursuant
to subsection 2.
2. The Department shall adopt regulations prescribing when
an identification card expires. The regulations adopted by the
Department pursuant to this section must not establish an
expiration date which is later than the eighth anniversary of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
birthday of the holder of the identification card measured, in the
case of an original identification card, a renewal identification
card and a renewal of an expired identification card, from the
birthday nearest the date of issuance or renewal.
3. An identification card is renewable at any time before its
expiration upon application.
Sec. 15. 1. Upon furnishing information that his or her
identification card is lost or destroyed, the person to whom the
original was issued may obtain a duplicate.
2. If the original of a duplicated identification card is
subsequently recovered or a lost identification card is found, the
person having possession shall return it immediately to the
Department.
Sec. 16. A person who:
1. Forges or alters an identification card or knowingly
possesses an altered or forged identification card;
2. Refuses to surrender an identification card for
cancellation when so directed by the Department;
3. Lends his or her identification card to another person for
the other’s use or uses an identification card issued to another
person; or
4. Willfully fails to surrender to the Department within 10
days after another’s identification card comes into his or her
possession or to return it to the proper holder,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 17. NRS 179D.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179D.570 1. The Central Repository shall, in accordance
with the requirements of this section, share information concerning
sex offenders and offenders convicted of a crime against a child
with:
(a) The Nevada Gaming Control Board to carry out the
provisions of NRS 463.335 pertaining to the registration of a
gaming employee who is a sex offender or an offender convicted of
a crime against a child. The Central Repository shall, at least once
each calendar month, provide the Nevada Gaming Control Board
with the name and other identifying information of each offender
who is not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, in the
manner and form agreed upon by the Central Repository and the
Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles to carry out the
provisions of NRS 483.283, 483.861 and 483.929.
(c) The Department of Health and Human Services to carry
out the provisions of section 12 of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
2. The information shared by the Central Repository pursuant
to this section must indicate whether a sex offender or an offender
convicted of a crime against a child is in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter.
3. The Central Repository shall share information pursuant to
this section as expeditiously as possible under the circumstances.
4. The Central Repository may adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 18. NRS 237.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
237.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
with respect to any activity or transaction in which a local
government accepts an identification card issued by the Department
of Motor Vehicles to identify a person, the local government may
also accept an identification card issued by the Department of
Health and Human Services pursuant to sections 2 to 16,
inclusive, of this act, a consular identification card, permanent
resident card or tribal identification card to identify a person.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 apply only to the presentation
of an identification card issued by the Department of Health and
Human Services, a consular identification card, permanent resident
card or tribal identification card for purposes of identification and
do not convey an independent right to receive benefits of any type.
3. To be accepted pursuant to subsection 1 to identify a person,
an identification card issued by a tribal government must contain:
(a) The full legal name of the holder of the card;
(b) The date of birth of the holder of the card;
(c) A unique number assigned to the holder of the card;
(d) A digital photograph of the full face of the holder of the
card;
(e) The address of the principal residence of the holder of the
card;
(f) A physical description of the holder of the card, including,
without limitation, the height, weight, hair color and eye color of the
holder of the card;
(g) The usual signature of the holder of the card;
(h) The date on which the card is issued; and
(i) A reference to the tribal government which issued the card.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Consular identification card” means an identification card
issued by a consulate of a foreign government, which consulate is
located within the State of Nevada.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(b) “Identification card issued by the Department of Motor
Vehicles” means an identification card of the type described in NRS
483.810 to 483.890, inclusive.
(c) “Local government” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 237.050.
(d) “Permanent resident card” means a Permanent Resident Card
issued by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services of
the Department of Homeland Security.
(e) “Tribal government” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239C.105.
(f) “Tribal identification card” means an identification card
issued by a tribal government which satisfies the requirements of
subsection 3.
Sec. 19. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 7 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 20. This act becomes effective:
1. Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
2. On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)